Massachusetts, session 194th, H860.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 25B of chapter 54 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “election.”, in line 34, the 
following words:-The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall develop a mechanism for voters to 
opt out of vote by mail mailers.  
SECTION 2. Said section 25B of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by inserting after the word “paragraph”, in line 257, the following words:- 
If twenty-five percent or more of the votes cast in the prior state election in any 
municipality were by mail, pursuant to this section the mayor of a city or board of selectmen or 
select board of a town may opt to reduce or eliminate early voting as authorized by this section . 
If twenty-five percent or more of the votes cast in the prior state election in a municipality were 
by mail pursuant to this section , the mayor of a city or board of selectmen or select board of a 
town may opt to reduce or eliminate early voting pursuant to this section.